apertium-sv-da/dev/comb.da.dix
    <pardef n="jordbær__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ren</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ret</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mail__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hus__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="menneske__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="duel__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/og__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogen</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øgerne</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øger</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>og<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paryk__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ken</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kerne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ker</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pik__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ken</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="h/ånd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænderne</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænder</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ånden</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ånd</l>
          <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fløjl__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="æg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>get</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bjælkehus"><i>bjælkehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="centralsygehus"><i>centralsygehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etplanshus"><i>etplanshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="firetageshus"><i>firetageshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frysehus"><i>frysehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="helårshus"><i>helårshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kernehus"><i>kernehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kulturhus"><i>kulturhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nulenergihus"><i>nulenergihus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="posthus"><i>posthus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sneglehus"><i>sneglehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sygehus"><i>sygehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="typehus"><i>typehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="admiralskib"><i>admiralskib</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="afskedsbrev"><i>afskedsbrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ål"><i>ål</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anretterbord"><i>anretterbord</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atlasblad"><i>atlasblad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bagland"><i>bagland</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bedrag"><i>bedrag</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biland"><i>biland</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blad"><i>blad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bøgeblad"><i>bøgeblad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="børneblad"><i>børneblad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brakvand"><i>brakvand</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brug"><i>brug</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bulkskib"><i>bulkskib</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chartr"><i>chartr</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dampskib"><i>dampskib</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dreng"><i>dreng</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eg"><i>eg</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fællesnavn"><i>fællesnavn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fil"><i>fil</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flab"><i>flab</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fond"><i>fond</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fornavn"><i>fornavn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fyringsbrev"><i>fyringsbrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="genhør"><i>genhør</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gulv"><i>gulv</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hjelm"><i>hjelm</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hyrdebrev"><i>hyrdebrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kælenavn"><i>kælenavn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kirkeskib"><i>kirkeskib</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koffardiskib"><i>koffardiskib</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kryb"><i>kryb</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lagr"><i>lagr</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lov"><i>lov</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="metalbord"><i>metalbord</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nodeblad"><i>nodeblad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opland"><i>opland</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pantebrev"><i>pantebrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="præg"><i>præg</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reservepostbud"><i>reservepostbud</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rutsj"><i>rutsj</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="segl"><i>segl</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skab"><i>skab</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skjaldedigt"><i>skjaldedigt</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skrig"><i>skrig</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slask"><i>slask</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smuglerskib"><i>smuglerskib</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sølvtøjsskab"><i>sølvtøjsskab</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stænk"><i>stænk</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stil"><i>stil</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sund"><i>sund</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="syn"><i>syn</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tebrev"><i>tebrev</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tipvognstog"><i>tipvognstog</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trav"><i>trav</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uddrag"><i>uddrag</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ugeblad"><i>ugeblad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vandbad"><i>vandbad</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vrist"><i>vrist</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="folk"><i>folk</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oplag"><i>oplag</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tak"><i>tak</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
